Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB65.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds that proposed ordinary amendments of the following administrative
regulations were found deficient pursuant to KRS 13A.030, and then later withdrawn by the administrative
body, on or after April 15, 2024, and before March 30, 2025, as evidenced by the records of the Legislative
Research Commission:
(a) 907 KAR 1:044, Coverage Provisions and Requirements Regarding Community Mental Health
Center Behavioral Health Services; and
(b) 907 KAR 15:005, Definitions for 907 KAR Chapter 15.
(2) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the proposed ordinary
amendments referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of the
effective date of this Act.
(3) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative
body shall be prohibited from promulgating administrative regulations that are identical to, or substantially
the same as, the proposed amendments referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning
on January 7, 2025, and concluding on June 1, 2026.
(4) The proposed amendments referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the
office of the Legislative Research Commission's regulations compiler.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds that proposed ordinary amendments of the following administrative
regulations were found deficient pursuant to KRS 13A.030, on or after April 15, 2024, and before March
30, 2025, as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission:
(a) 405 KAR 10:001, Definitions for 405 KAR Chapter 10;
(b) 405 KAR 10:015, General Bonding Provisions; and
(c) 808 KAR 3:050, Conduct of Credit Unions.
(2) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the proposed ordinary
amendments referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of the
effective date of this Act.
(3) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative
body shall be prohibited from promulgating administrative regulations that are identical to, or substantially
the same as, the proposed amendments referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning
on January 7, 2025, and concluding on June 1, 2026.
(4) The proposed amendments referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the
office of the Legislative Research Commission's regulations compiler.
Section 3. Whereas it is crucial that the Commonwealth's regulatory policy reflect the statutory intent of
the General Assembly, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden March 27, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version